Utah statutes.
72-1-204.   Divisions enumerated -- Duties.
The divisions of the department are:
(1)  the Administrative Services Division responsible for:
(a)  all personnel management including recruiting, training, testing,
developing, and assisting the transition of personnel into the department;
(b)  maintaining records;
(c)  data processing;
(d)  procuring administrative supplies and equipment; and
(e)  risk management;
(2)  the Comptroller Division responsible for:
(a)  all financial aspects of the department, including budgeting, accounting,
and contracting; and
(b)  providing all material data and documentation necessary for effective
fiscal planning and programming;
(3)  the Internal Audit Division responsible for:
(a)  conducting and verifying all internal audits and reviews within the
department;
(b)  performing financial and compliance audits to determine the allowability
and reasonableness of proposals, accounting records, and final costs of
consultants, contractors, utility companies, and other entities used by the
department; and
(c)  implementing audit procedures that meet or exceed generally accepted
auditing standards relating to revenues, expenditures, and funding;
(4)  the Community Relations Division responsible for:
(a)  coordinating, organizing, and managing the department's public hearing
process;
(b)  responding to citizens' complaints and requests;
(c)  developing and implementing the department's public information programs;
(d)  assisting the divisions and regions in the department's citizen
involvement programs; and
(e)  preparing and distributing internal department communications;
(5)  the Program Development Division responsible for:
(a)  developing transportation plans for state transportation systems;
(b)  collecting, processing, and storing transportation data to support
department's engineering functions;
(c)  designating state transportation systems qualifications;
(d)  developing a statewide transportation improvement program for approval by
the commission;
(e)  providing cartographic services to the department; and
(f)  assisting local governments in participating in federal-aid
transportation programs;
(6)  the Project Development Division responsible for:
(a)  developing statewide standards for project design and construction;
(b)  providing support for project development in the areas of design
environment, right-of-way, materials testing, structures, value engineering,
and construction;
(c)  designing specialty projects; and
(d)  performing research into materials and methods for construction of state
transportation systems; and
(7)  the Operations Division responsible for:
(a)  maintaining the state transportation systems;
(b)  state transportation systems safety;
(c)  operating state ports-of-entry;
(d)  operating state motor carrier safety programs in accordance with this
title and federal law;
(e)  aeronautical operations; and
(f)  providing equipment for department engineering and maintenance functions.
